New York, session 2025-2026, A1029.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 230.45 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 230.45 Limited immunity from prosecution. 4 1. This section applies where a person is the victim of or a witness 5 to a crime (including an individual who becomes aware that another 6 person is a victim of a crime), and has engaged or is alleged to have 7 engaged in an act prohibited under section 230.00 or 230.03 of this 8 article at or in reasonable proximity to the time of the crime or under 9 circumstances reasonably related to the crime, and, in good faith but 10 not prior to, during or subsequent to an arrest or investigation for 11 such prohibited act, (a) reports the crime to a criminal law enforcement 12 agency, (b) if medically necessary, seeks or receives health care 13 services as a result of the crime, or (c) attempts to assist in the 14 investigation or prosecution of the crime. No such victim or witness to 15 the crime shall be charged or prosecuted for an offense under section 16 230.00 or 230.03 of this article which is alleged to have been committed EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00064-04-5 A. 1029--B 2 1 at or in reasonable proximity to the time of the crime or under circum- 2 stances reasonably related to the crime for which the person is a victim 3 or witness. As used in this section, "crime" shall include an act that 4 reasonably appears to be a crime, regardless of whether it results in a 5 conviction as a crime. 6 2. Where a victim or witness to a crime believes that the conditions 7 for immunity pursuant to subdivision one of this section have been met 8 and such victim or witness has been erroneously charged under section 9 230.00 or 230.03 of this article, such victim or witness may request a 10 hearing to be conducted no later than fifteen days after the charge or 11 charges have been filed to move the court to decide whether conditions 12 for immunity have been met. At such hearing, the court shall be permit- 13 ted to accept all legally permitted evidence, including legally permis- 14 sible hearsay, in support of both parties. If, after conducting such 15 hearing, and by clear and convincing evidence, the court determines that 16 the conditions for immunity were met, then the charge or charges shall 17 be dismissed. If, after conducting such hearing, the court determines 18 that the conditions for immunity were not met, then the charges shall 19 not be dismissed and immunity shall be denied. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 21 have become a law, and shall apply to any prosecution pending on or 22 after the time it shall take effect.